Louisiana, session 2026, SB93.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Arts. 312(A), (B), the introductory paragraph
of (D), and (1) and (2), and (G)(2)(a), 316(1), (9), and (10), 318, 319(A), and 320(J)(1) are
hereby amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Arts. 312(G)(2)(c) and (d),
312.1, 315(D), and 316(11) through (13) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 312. Right to bail before and after conviction
A. Except as provided in this Article and, Article 312.1, Article 313, or
Article 313.1, a person in custody who is charged with the commission of an offense
is entitled to bail before conviction.
B.(1) A person released on a previously posted bail undertaking for any of
the following shall not be readmitted to bail when the person previously failed
to appear and a warrant for arrest was issued and not recalled or the previous
bail undertaking has been revoked or forfeited:
(1) a (a) A crime of violence as defined by R.S. 14:2(B) which carries a
minimum mandatory sentence of imprisonment upon conviction or.
(2) the (b) The production, manufacture, distribution, or dispensing or
possession with intent to produce, manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled
dangerous substance as defined by the Louisiana Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 93 ENROLLED
Substances Law, shall not be readmitted to bail when the person previously failed to
appear and a warrant for arrest was issued and not recalled or the previous bail
undertaking has been revoked or forfeited.
(c) Any offense involving the possession or use of a firearm.
(d) Any sex offense as defined by R.S. 15:541.
(2) If a person voluntarily appears without confinement by a law enforcement
officer or bail recovery agent following a motion to revoke bail or issuance of an
arrest warrant for failure to appear but prior to revocation or forfeiture, then he may
be released only under one of the following circumstances:
(1)(a) After a contradictory hearing, a person may be released on the
previously posted bail undertaking if the motion to revoke bail is rescinded or the
arrest warrant is recalled and the surety is present or represented at the hearing and
gives written consent. Previous instances of revocation and forfeiture in unrelated
cases are admissible at the hearing. This relief is available only once.
(2)(b) A person may be released on a new bail undertaking without a
contradictory hearing only on bail with a commercial surety and in an amount higher
than the original bail.
* * *
D. A convicted person shall be remanded to jail to await sentence, and shall
be remanded to custody after sentencing, unless any of the following occur:
(1) He is allowed to remain free on a bail undertaking posted prior to
conviction by operation of Article 331(A), and the bail previously fixed is in
accordance with all of the applicable provisions of this Article and other applicable
law.
(2) He is released by virtue of a bail undertaking posted after conviction, and
the bail was fixed in accordance with this Article and other applicable law.
However, post conviction bail is not authorized pursuant to this Article when
there is proof of a substantial risk that the person may flee or poses an
imminent danger to any other person or the community, including when the
court finds the convicted person is likely to commit other crimes while on bail
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 93 ENROLLED
and is therefore a danger to the community.
* * *
G.(1) * * *
(2)(a) After conviction of any crime punishable by imprisonment for twenty-
five years or more that is both either a sex offense and or a crime of violence, there
shall be a rebuttable presumption that the release of the person convicted will pose
a danger to another person or the community and that there is a substantial risk that
the person convicted might flee.
* * *
(c) This Paragraph applies based on the cumulative maximum sentences
for all crimes for which a person was convicted, provided that any crime for
which the person has been convicted is a sex offense or crime of violence as
defined in this Paragraph.
(d) This Paragraph also applies to any person who has been charged as
a habitual offender pursuant to R.S. 15:529.1.
* * *
Art. 312.1. Revocation of bail upon subsequent felony arrest
A. If a defendant is admitted to bail for any crime of violence, any sex
offense, or any crime involving the possession or use of a firearm, the bail for
such offense shall be revoked upon any subsequent arrest for a felony offense
that is not a part of the same transaction, occurrence, or criminal episode which
resulted in the arrest that is the basis for the defendant's current admittance to
bail.
B.(1) Prior to booking the defendant, the arresting agency shall conduct
a prompt and diligent search to determine if the defendant is currently on bail
for any crime of violence, any sex offense, or any crime involving the possession
or use of a firearm.
(2) The arresting agency shall provide the court with the information
described in Subparagraph (1) of this Paragraph, along with an updated
criminal history with all other booking information, for the court to consider
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 93 ENROLLED
when determining the defendant's entitlement to bail, the amount of bail, and
conditions of bail.
C. If the court determines that the defendant is currently on bail for any
crime of violence, any sex offense, or any crime involving the possession or use
of a firearm, the bail for such offense shall be revoked upon any subsequent
arrest for a felony offense that is not a part of the same transaction, occurrence,
or criminal episode which resulted in the arrest that is the basis for the
defendant's current admittance to bail. The court shall enter an order revoking
such prior bail, pending a bail hearing which may be invoked by the state or the
defendant. Either party may seek supervisory review of the granting or denial
of any order that revokes the defendant's prior admittance to bail.
D. For the purposes of this Article, the following terms have the
following meanings:
(1) "Crime of violence" means any offense defined or enumerated as a
crime of violence in R.S. 14:2(B).
(2) "Sex offense" means any offense that requires registration and
notification pursuant to R.S. 15:540 et seq.
* * *
Art. 315. Schedules of bail
* * *
D. A bail schedule implemented by a district court shall fix the minimum
bail amount for the following offenses, and any court that does not utilize a bail
schedule shall not approve a bail undertaking that is less than the minimum
amount specified for the following offenses:
(1) For possession of child sexual abuse materials, R.S. 14:81.1, fifty
thousand dollars.
(2) For production of child sexual abuse materials, R.S. 14:81.1, one
hundred thousand dollars.
Art. 316. Factors in fixing amount of bail
The amount of bail shall be fixed in an amount that will ensure the presence
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 93 ENROLLED
of the defendant, as required, and the safety of any other person and the community,
having regard to:
(1) The seriousness of the offense charged, including but not limited to
whether the offense is a crime of violence, sex offense, or involves a controlled
dangerous substance.
* * *
(9) Whether a firearm or other dangerous weapon was possessed or used
during the commission of the offense.
(10) Whether available resources exist within the jurisdiction to impose
enforceable conditions that would help ensure the defendant's appearance and
protect the community.
(11) The likelihood that the defendant, if released on bail, will continue
to commit crimes resulting in harm to any person or the property of another.
(9)(12) Any other circumstances affecting the probability of defendant's
appearance.
(10)(13) The type or form of bail.
* * *
Art. 318. Juvenile records in fixing bail
A. For the purpose of fixing bail, a court may make a written request of any
juvenile court for an abstract containing only the pending or adjudicated delinquent
acts of a defendant currently before the requesting court. The request shall be
promptly complied with; however, juvenile court shall promptly comply with the
request; however, not more than forty-eight hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays,
and legal holidays, shall lapse before the requested information is deposited in the
mail, by means of an email address provided in the written request addressed to
the requesting court.
B. The requesting court shall not copy, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce
such juvenile records, and these shall be deposited in the mail and addressed to the
issuing juvenile court within seventy-two hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays,
and legal holidays, after bail is determined issue a protective order concerning the
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 93 ENROLLED
use of the juvenile abstract for the purposes of protecting the confidentiality of
the abstract from any individual who is not involved in the relevant proceedings
that concern the defendant who is currently before the requesting court.
Art. 319. Modifications of bail
A. The court having trial jurisdiction over the offense charged, on its own
motion or on motion of the prosecuting attorney or defendant, for good cause, may
either increase or reduce, subject to any minimum amount provided by law, the
amount of bail, or require new or additional security. For purposes of this Article,
good cause for increase of bail specifically includes but is not limited to the rearrest
of the defendant on offenses alleged to have been committed while out on a bail
undertaking. The modification of any bail order wherein a bail undertaking has been
posted by a criminal defendant and his sureties shall upon the modification terminate
the liability of the defendant and his sureties under the previously existing bail
undertaking. A new bail undertaking must be posted in the amount of the new bail
order.
* * *
Art. 320. Conditions of bail undertaking
* * *
J.(1) Crimes of violence. Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph G of
this Article and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if the
defendant is alleged to have committed a crime of violence as defined in R.S.
14:2(B), the court shall require as a condition the following conditions of bail:
(a)(i) that That the defendant refrain from going to the residence or
household of the victim, the victim's school, and the victim's place of employment
or otherwise contacting the victim in any manner whatsoever, and shall refrain from
having any further contact with the victim. The court shall also require as a condition
of bail that the defendant be prohibited from communicating, by electronic
communication, in writing, or orally, with a victim of the offense, or with any of the
victim's immediate family members.
(ii) This condition does not apply if the victim consents by way of a request
Page 6 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 93 ENROLLED
to the court and the court issues an order permitting the communication. If an
immediate family member of the victim consents by way of a request to the court
and the court issues an order permitting the communication, then the defendant may
contact that person.
(b) That the defendant, if equipped with a global positioning monitoring
system, comply with the appropriate geographic restrictions, monitoring
conditions, and enforcement provisions of R.S. 15:571.36, 571. 37, and 571.38.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.